hunspell/kpv/komi.aff
FLAG long
SFX U9 ны тысьясланьтіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясланьтіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясланьтіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясланьтіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясланьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясланьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясланьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясланяд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясланям/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясланяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясланяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясланяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясланяс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснад/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснам/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснас/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясныдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясныдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясныдлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясныдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясныдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясныдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснымкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснымла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснымлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснымлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснымлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснымлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснымӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясныскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясныслань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясныслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясныслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясныслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснысӧ/G2 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяснытӧ/G2 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧдз/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧйкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧйла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧйлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧйланьсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧйлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧйлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧйлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧйся/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧйсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧйтӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясся/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссяньым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссяыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьяссяыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясті/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьястіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьястіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьястіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьястіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьястіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьястіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьястӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьястӧгныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьястӧгным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьястӧгныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьястӧгыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьястӧгыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясыдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясыдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясыдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясыдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясыдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясын/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясыскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясыслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясыслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясыслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысьясысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысяд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысям/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысянӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тысяс/G1G2G3 .

SFX V0 Y 73 # +и
SFX V0 ьыны и/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны иг/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игад/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игам/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны иганыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны иганым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны иганыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игас/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игвыв/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игкежлад/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игкежланыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игкежланым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игкежланыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игкежлас/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игкежлӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игкості/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игкостіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игкостіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игкостіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игкостіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игкостіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игмоз/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игмозным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игмозныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игмозыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игмозыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игӧныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игӧным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игӧныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игӧнныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игӧнным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игӧнныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игсор/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игсорӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игтыр/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игтырйи/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игтырйиныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игтырйиным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игтырйиныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игтырйиыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игтырйиыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игчӧж/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игчӧжӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игчӧжныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игчӧжным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игчӧжныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игчӧжыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игчӧжыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игъяс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игъясад/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игъясам/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игъясаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игъясаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игъясаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игъясас/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игъясӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны игъясӧ/G1G2 .
SFX V0 ьыны игъясын/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны ид/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны им/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны имӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны имоз/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны имӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны ин/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны инныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны ины/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны иныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны ис/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны исмоз/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны исны/G1G2G3 .
SFX V0 ьыны исныс/G1G2G3 .
