hunspell/kpv/komi.dic
возглавляйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
поощряйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
обозначайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
обусловливайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
питайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кӧзырокассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
объявляйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
внедряйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пропускайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
восстановитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
простреливайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
согласовывайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гумовтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
выясняйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
обстреливайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сьӧвзьыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
бертовтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лешкыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
думыштчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кабыртсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чирӧстсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
юыштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
воспринимайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
койсьыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ӧвтчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
располагайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сювксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
цитируйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
погружайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
изображайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
заводитчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
больгыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пайксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гиджгыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вӧрзьыштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
топӧдчыштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
контролируйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
равӧстсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
нюмзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кутыштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
паняссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мелйӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
орошайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тутсыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шамыртчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
осмысливайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
варьируйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пельӧсассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шавксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тӧждысьлывсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
зарниӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гажмыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
черӧбзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ышловзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ёгзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
йизьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ямзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
дӧнзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гирзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
дзӧрзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
бырзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ярзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
зальзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пыльзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чилльыны/W3W9V0V5V7
восьтыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
удостоверяйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
описывайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кояссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гыӧрӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
транслируйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
певксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
выжывмыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
формируйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
нусьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
проветривайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
рабсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шапкаавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
виджадавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
зорӧдавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чорыдавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вомдзавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сиавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кыскавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мыськавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вежлавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сорлавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ньылавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
домавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лямавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сынавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вугравсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
горавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
куравсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
весавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пысавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
йӧйтавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
муртавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
дзоньтавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шуавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
овсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вывсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гӧрлывсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ӧткодявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
колявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
збоявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
туявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пожъявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
донъявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
жбыръявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
выявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мойдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
бергӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пемдӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вуджӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
удзӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ызйӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чошкӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
велӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
зэлӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
нимӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вичмӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
донӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кыпӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
косӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сьӧктӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тӧдчӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ловзьӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
колльӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лӧсьӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вежсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
эжсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лэдзсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сёйсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сюйсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лявксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
коксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тірксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чуксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гольксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
синтӧмсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
венсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шпыньмунсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вӧйпсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
йирсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вурсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
локтыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
коркаассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кальӧгассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пежассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
уджйӧзассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
меліассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гудӧкассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
петукассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
киськассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
велассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
орлассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тӧдмассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
помассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пӧртмассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вежӧнассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сарпассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сирассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ӧтсорассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
йизэрассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
водзӧсассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вӧтассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
висьтассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
рочассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кышассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
боссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ёгӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пежӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
номйӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лудікӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мелӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гуранӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чепӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чукырӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кляптӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
виргаддьӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
нӧгыльӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чирссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тангыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
индыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
увйыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
перйыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кӧсйыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пышйыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
колскыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вачкыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
дітшкыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
радлыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
волыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
быдмыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ышмыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
быдтыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
йӧктыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мынтыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
воштыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
велӧдчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мучитчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пӧрччыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тӧвзьыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ӧвсьыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гаддяссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
желляссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
щӧтяссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вужъяссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
оръяссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
нюмъёвтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
петсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
дивитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
прӧйдитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
клеитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тормозитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
снимитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сравнитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шкоркнитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сёрнитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
состоитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мудеритсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
буритсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
нартитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
решитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
взрывайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
побеждайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
снабжайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
разбирайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
качайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тойтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
преследуйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
критикуйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
соборуйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
применяйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сигӧртсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ойбыртсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
койыштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шеныштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
казьтыштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сусьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ӧшсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ытшкывлысьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вольсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мыссьыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
увтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
куттьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лябмыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гырзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
угадывайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
комӧксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кинзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тэрмыштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
заселяйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ватӧмсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
валъяссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лиыштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шышкӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
подвергайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
